Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,121
Tax status of bonds and other obligations.

(1) All bonds, notes, certificates, and other instruments evidencing indebtedness of a housing agency or any controlled affiliate thereof are deemed to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and shall be free of taxation of any kind by this state and its public agencies unless the agency issuing such bonds, notes, certificates, or other instruments shall elect that they be taxable. Any such election shall apply only to the specific issue of bonds, notes, certificates, or other instruments with respect to which such election is expressly made.

(2) All bonds, notes, certificates, and other instruments evidencing indebtedness or conveying equity participations issued by a local housing agency or any controlled affiliate thereof are deemed to be issued for an essential governmental purpose.

(3) A local housing agency may issue bonds, notes, certificates, or other instruments evidencing indebtedness on behalf of others to carry out any purpose authorized by the Nebraska Housing Agency Act.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 50.